Utah statutes.
62A-4a-903.   Eligibility.
(1)  The Division of Child and Family Services shall establish, by rule,
eligibility criteria for the receipt of adoption assistance and supplemental
adoption assistance.
(2)  Eligibility determination shall be based upon:
(a)  the needs of the child;
(b)  the resources available to the child; and
(c)  the federal requirements of Section 473, Social Security Act.
